Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 1. General Provisions

§§ 11-7-101 through 11-7-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 64, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 148, §§ 19 through 31, related to apiary inspections.

§§ 11-7-118 through 11-7-129.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1979, ch. 64, § 1, contained the Wyoming Agricultural Act of 1979.

§ 11-7-130.
Short
title.

This chapter may be cited
as the “Wyoming Apiculture Act”.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “of 1983” at the end.

§ 11-7-131.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Apiary” means a place where one (1) or more colonies of bees or one (1) or more hives containing honeycombs or bee combs are kept;

“Bee diseases” means American or European foulbrood, sacbrood, bee paralysis or other disease or abnormal condition of the egg, larval, pupal or adult stages of bees, including bee parasites and bee pests;

“Bees” means any stage of the life cycle in the genus Apis;

“Colony” means the bees, hive and all equipment used in connection with the hive;

“Comb” means the brood chamber used by the queen for the protection of brood;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Equipment” means hives, supers, frames, veils, gloves or any apparatus, tools, machines or other devices used in the handling and manipulation of bees, honey, wax and hives and includes any container of honey and wax which may be used in an apiary or in transporting bees and their products and apiary supplies;

“Family unit” means two (2) or more persons living together or residing in the same dwelling, house or other place of residence;

“General apiary” means any apiary other than a pollination apiary, landowner apiary or hobbyist apiary;

“Hive” means a frame hive, box hive, box, barrel, log gun, skep or other receptacle or container or a part of a container, natural or artificial, which may be used as a domicile for bees;

“Hobbyist apiary” means an apiary owned by a hobbyist beekeeper;

“Hobbyist beekeeper” means a person who owns a total of not more than five (5) hives;

“Landowner” means the person who has the actual use and exclusive possession of the land upon which a landowner apiary is to be registered, except that a person leasing or renting land for the primary purpose of locating or establishing an apiary thereon is not considered a landowner;

“Landowner apiary” means an apiary owned by a landowner as defined in this section;

“Person” means any individual, association, partnership or corporation;

“Pollination apiary” means an apiary operated for pollination of commercial seed, fruit or other commercial agricultural product as provided in W.S.

11-7-203

;

“Queen apiary” means an apiary or premises in which queen bees are reared or kept for sale or gift;

“Bee parasites” means mites, including but not limited to varroa mites and tracheal mites;

“Bee pests” means insects, including but not limited to small hive beetles and red imported fire ants;

“General beekeeper” means a person who owns more than five (5) hives and manages and operates the bees and the hives;

“Global positioning system or GPS” means a device that provides accuracy in positioning using latitude and longitude coordinates;

“Holding yard” means an area where colonies are temporarily placed prior to leaving the state or returning from pollination in another state;

“Spray yard” means a temporary location where colonies are moved prior to any pesticide application in the area of the beekeeper’s registered location.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1; 2010, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added “including bee parasites and bee pests” in (a)(ii); substituted “life cycle” for “bees” in (a)(iii); inserted “bees” in (a)(iv); and added (a)(xviii) through (a)(xxiii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-7-132.
Disposition of fees.

Registration and inspection
fees collected under this chapter shall be transmitted by the department
to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.

§ 11-7-133.
Penalties.

Any person who violates
any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon
conviction shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00)
or imprisoned in the county jail for not more than six (6) months,
or both. Each day the violation continues constitutes a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 7, § 1.